Illinois, session 104th, HB2699.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-2)7    Sec. 5-2. Classes of persons eligible. Medical assistance 8under this Article shall be available to any of the following 9classes of persons in respect to whom a plan for coverage has 10been submitted to the Governor by the Illinois Department and 11approved by him. If changes made in this Section 5-2 require 12federal approval, they shall not take effect until such 13approval has been received:14        1. Recipients of basic maintenance grants under 15    Articles III and IV.16        2. Beginning January 1, 2014, persons otherwise 17    eligible for basic maintenance under Article III, 18    excluding any eligibility requirements that are 19    inconsistent with any federal law or federal regulation, 20    as interpreted by the U.S. Department of Health and Human 21    Services, but who fail to qualify thereunder on the basis 22    of need, and who have insufficient income and resources to 23    meet the costs of necessary medical care, including, but   HB2699- 2 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    not limited to, the following:2            (a) All persons otherwise eligible for basic 3        maintenance under Article III but who fail to qualify 4        under that Article on the basis of need and who meet 5        either of the following requirements:6                (i) their income, as determined by the 7            Illinois Department in accordance with any federal 8            requirements, is equal to or less than 100% of the 9            federal poverty level; or10                (ii) their income, after the deduction of 11            costs incurred for medical care and for other 12            types of remedial care, is equal to or less than 13            100% of the federal poverty level.14            (b) (Blank).15        3. (Blank).16        4. Persons not eligible under any of the preceding 17    paragraphs who fall sick, are injured, or die, not having 18    sufficient money, property or other resources to meet the 19    costs of necessary medical care or funeral and burial 20    expenses.21        5.(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, individuals during 22    pregnancy and during the 12-month period beginning on the 23    last day of the pregnancy, together with their infants, 24    whose income is at or below 200% of the federal poverty 25    level. Until September 30, 2019, or sooner if the 26    maintenance of effort requirements under the Patient   HB2699- 3 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    Protection and Affordable Care Act are eliminated or may 2    be waived before then, individuals during pregnancy and 3    during the 12-month period beginning on the last day of 4    the pregnancy, whose countable monthly income, after the 5    deduction of costs incurred for medical care and for other 6    types of remedial care as specified in administrative 7    rule, is equal to or less than the Medical Assistance-No 8    Grant(C) (MANG(C)) Income Standard in effect on April 1, 9    2013 as set forth in administrative rule.10        (b) The plan for coverage shall provide ambulatory 11    prenatal care to pregnant individuals during a presumptive 12    eligibility period and establish an income eligibility 13    standard that is equal to 200% of the federal poverty 14    level, provided that costs incurred for medical care are 15    not taken into account in determining such income 16    eligibility.17        (c) The Illinois Department may conduct a 18    demonstration in at least one county that will provide 19    medical assistance to pregnant individuals together with 20    their infants and children up to one year of age, where the 21    income eligibility standard is set up to 185% of the 22    nonfarm income official poverty line, as defined by the 23    federal Office of Management and Budget. The Illinois 24    Department shall seek and obtain necessary authorization 25    provided under federal law to implement such a 26    demonstration. Such demonstration may establish resource   HB2699- 4 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    standards that are not more restrictive than those 2    established under Article IV of this Code.3        6. (a) Subject to federal approval, children younger 4    than age 19 when countable income is at or below 313% of 5    the federal poverty level, as determined by the Department 6    and in accordance with all applicable federal 7    requirements. The Department is authorized to adopt 8    emergency rules to implement the changes made to this 9    paragraph by Public Act 102-43. Until September 30, 2019, 10    or sooner if the maintenance of effort requirements under 11    the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act are 12    eliminated or may be waived before then, children younger 13    than age 19 whose countable monthly income, after the 14    deduction of costs incurred for medical care and for other 15    types of remedial care as specified in administrative 16    rule, is equal to or less than the Medical Assistance-No 17    Grant(C) (MANG(C)) Income Standard in effect on April 1, 18    2013 as set forth in administrative rule.19        (b) Children and youth who are under temporary custody 20    or guardianship of the Department of Children and Family 21    Services or who receive financial assistance in support of 22    an adoption or guardianship placement from the Department 23    of Children and Family Services. 24        7. (Blank).25        8. As required under federal law, persons who are 26    eligible for Transitional Medical Assistance as a result   HB2699- 5 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    of an increase in earnings or child or spousal support 2    received. The plan for coverage for this class of persons 3    shall:4            (a) extend the medical assistance coverage to the 5        extent required by federal law; and6            (b) offer persons who have initially received 6 7        months of the coverage provided in paragraph (a) 8        above, the option of receiving an additional 6 months 9        of coverage, subject to the following:10                (i) such coverage shall be pursuant to 11            provisions of the federal Social Security Act;12                (ii) such coverage shall include all services 13            covered under Illinois' State Medicaid Plan;14                (iii) no premium shall be charged for such 15            coverage; and16                (iv) such coverage shall be suspended in the 17            event of a person's failure without good cause to 18            file in a timely fashion reports required for this 19            coverage under the Social Security Act and 20            coverage shall be reinstated upon the filing of 21            such reports if the person remains otherwise 22            eligible.23        9. Persons with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome 24    (AIDS) or with AIDS-related conditions with respect to 25    whom there has been a determination that but for home or 26    community-based services such individuals would require   HB2699- 6 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    the level of care provided in an inpatient hospital, 2    skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility the 3    cost of which is reimbursed under this Article. Assistance 4    shall be provided to such persons to the maximum extent 5    permitted under Title XIX of the Federal Social Security 6    Act.7        10. Participants in the long-term care insurance 8    partnership program established under the Illinois 9    Long-Term Care Partnership Program Act who meet the 10    qualifications for protection of resources described in 11    Section 15 of that Act.12        11. Persons with disabilities who are employed and 13    eligible for Medicaid, pursuant to Section 14    1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(xv) of the Social Security Act, and, 15    subject to federal approval, persons with a medically 16    improved disability who are employed and eligible for 17    Medicaid pursuant to Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(xvi) of 18    the Social Security Act, as provided by the Illinois 19    Department by rule. In establishing eligibility standards 20    under this paragraph 11, the Department shall, subject to 21    federal approval:22            (a) set the income eligibility standard at not 23        lower than 350% of the federal poverty level;24            (b) exempt retirement accounts that the person 25        cannot access without penalty before the age of 59 26        1/2, and medical savings accounts established pursuant   HB2699- 7 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1        to 26 U.S.C. 220;2            (c) allow non-exempt assets up to $25,000 as to 3        those assets accumulated during periods of eligibility 4        under this paragraph 11; and5            (d) continue to apply subparagraphs (b) and (c) in 6        determining the eligibility of the person under this 7        Article even if the person loses eligibility under 8        this paragraph 11. 9        12. Subject to federal approval, persons who are 10    eligible for medical assistance coverage under applicable 11    provisions of the federal Social Security Act and the 12    federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and 13    Treatment Act of 2000. Those eligible persons are defined 14    to include, but not be limited to, the following persons:15            (1) persons who have been screened for breast or 16        cervical cancer under the U.S. Centers for Disease 17        Control and Prevention Breast and Cervical Cancer 18        Program established under Title XV of the federal 19        Public Health Service Act in accordance with the 20        requirements of Section 1504 of that Act as 21        administered by the Illinois Department of Public 22        Health; and23            (2) persons whose screenings under the above 24        program were funded in whole or in part by funds 25        appropriated to the Illinois Department of Public 26        Health for breast or cervical cancer screening.  HB2699- 8 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1        "Medical assistance" under this paragraph 12 shall be 2    identical to the benefits provided under the State's 3    approved plan under Title XIX of the Social Security Act. 4    The Department must request federal approval of the 5    coverage under this paragraph 12 within 30 days after July 6    3, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 92-47).7        In addition to the persons who are eligible for 8    medical assistance pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) 9    of this paragraph 12, and to be paid from funds 10    appropriated to the Department for its medical programs, 11    any uninsured person as defined by the Department in rules 12    residing in Illinois who is younger than 65 years of age, 13    who has been screened for breast and cervical cancer in 14    accordance with standards and procedures adopted by the 15    Department of Public Health for screening, and who is 16    referred to the Department by the Department of Public 17    Health as being in need of treatment for breast or 18    cervical cancer is eligible for medical assistance 19    benefits that are consistent with the benefits provided to 20    those persons described in subparagraphs (1) and (2). 21    Medical assistance coverage for the persons who are 22    eligible under the preceding sentence is not dependent on 23    federal approval, but federal moneys may be used to pay 24    for services provided under that coverage upon federal 25    approval. 26        13. Subject to appropriation and to federal approval,   HB2699- 9 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    persons living with HIV/AIDS who are not otherwise 2    eligible under this Article and who qualify for services 3    covered under Section 5-5.04 as provided by the Illinois 4    Department by rule. 5        14. Subject to the availability of funds for this 6    purpose, the Department may provide coverage under this 7    Article to persons who8            (a) reside in Illinois; who9            (b) are not eligible under any of the preceding 10        paragraphs of this Section; and who11            (c) meet the income guidelines of paragraph 2(a) 12        of this Section; and13            (d) meet one of the following conditions: 14                (i) have filed an application for asylum 15            status under 8 U.S.C. 1158 that is pending with 16            the appropriate federal agency or have a pending 17            appeal of such an application pending before the 18            federal Department of Homeland Security or on 19            appeal before a court of competent jurisdiction 20            and are represented either by counsel or by an 21            advocate accredited by the appropriate federal 22            agency Department of Homeland Security and 23            employed by a not-for-profit organization in 24            regard to that application or appeal; , or25                (ii) are receiving services through a 26            federally funded torture treatment center;  HB2699- 10 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1                (iii) have filed a pending application for T 2            nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 3            1101(a)(15)(T);4                (iv) have filed a pending application for U 5            nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 6            1101(a)(15)(U); or 7                (v) have filed as a derivative family member 8            of a T nonimmigrant status applicant pursuant to 8 9            U.S.C. 1101(a)(15)(T) or a U nonimmigrant status 10            applicant pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(15)(U).11        Medical coverage under this paragraph 14 may be 12    provided for up to 24 continuous months from the initial 13    eligibility date so long as an individual continues to 14    satisfy the criteria of this paragraph 14. If an 15    individual has an application or appeal pending regarding 16    an application for asylum, T nonimmigrant status, or U 17    nonimmigrant status before the appropriate federal agency 18    for such applications or appeals Department of Homeland 19    Security, eligibility under this paragraph 14 may be 20    extended until a final decision is rendered with respect 21    to the application or appeal, except that an individual 22    who is approved for a U visa continues to qualify for 23    medical coverage under this paragraph 14 as long as the 24    individual meets all other eligibility criteria. For 25    purposes of this paragraph 14, "derivative family member" 26    means a spouse or child under the age of 21 on the appeal.   HB2699- 11 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    The Department may adopt rules governing the 2    implementation of this paragraph 14. 3        15. Family Care Eligibility.4            (a) On and after July 1, 2012, a parent or other 5        caretaker relative who is 19 years of age or older when 6        countable income is at or below 133% of the federal 7        poverty level. A person may not spend down to become 8        eligible under this paragraph 15. 9            (b) Eligibility shall be reviewed annually.10            (c) (Blank).11            (d) (Blank).12            (e) (Blank).13            (f) (Blank).14            (g) (Blank).15            (h) (Blank).16            (i) Following termination of an individual's 17        coverage under this paragraph 15, the individual must 18        be determined eligible before the person can be 19        re-enrolled.20        16. Subject to appropriation, uninsured persons who 21    are not otherwise eligible under this Section who have 22    been certified and referred by the Department of Public 23    Health as having been screened and found to need 24    diagnostic evaluation or treatment, or both diagnostic 25    evaluation and treatment, for prostate or testicular 26    cancer. For the purposes of this paragraph 16, uninsured   HB2699- 12 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    persons are those who do not have creditable coverage, as 2    defined under the Health Insurance Portability and 3    Accountability Act, or have otherwise exhausted any 4    insurance benefits they may have had, for prostate or 5    testicular cancer diagnostic evaluation or treatment, or 6    both diagnostic evaluation and treatment. To be eligible, 7    a person must furnish a Social Security number. A person's 8    assets are exempt from consideration in determining 9    eligibility under this paragraph 16. Such persons shall be 10    eligible for medical assistance under this paragraph 16 11    for so long as they need treatment for the cancer. A person 12    shall be considered to need treatment if, in the opinion 13    of the person's treating physician, the person requires 14    therapy directed toward cure or palliation of prostate or 15    testicular cancer, including recurrent metastatic cancer 16    that is a known or presumed complication of prostate or 17    testicular cancer and complications resulting from the 18    treatment modalities themselves. Persons who require only 19    routine monitoring services are not considered to need 20    treatment. "Medical assistance" under this paragraph 16 21    shall be identical to the benefits provided under the 22    State's approved plan under Title XIX of the Social 23    Security Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 24    the Department (i) does not have a claim against the 25    estate of a deceased recipient of services under this 26    paragraph 16 and (ii) does not have a lien against any   HB2699- 13 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    homestead property or other legal or equitable real 2    property interest owned by a recipient of services under 3    this paragraph 16.4        17. Persons who, pursuant to a waiver approved by the 5    Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human 6    Services, are eligible for medical assistance under Title 7    XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act. 8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 9    consistent with the terms of the approved waiver, the 10    Illinois Department, may by rule: 11            (a) Limit the geographic areas in which the waiver 12        program operates. 13            (b) Determine the scope, quantity, duration, and 14        quality, and the rate and method of reimbursement, of 15        the medical services to be provided, which may differ 16        from those for other classes of persons eligible for 17        assistance under this Article. 18            (c) Restrict the persons' freedom in choice of 19        providers. 20        18. Beginning January 1, 2014, persons aged 19 or 21    older, but younger than 65, who are not otherwise eligible 22    for medical assistance under this Section 5-2, who qualify 23    for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 24    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) and applicable federal 25    regulations, and who have income at or below 133% of the 26    federal poverty level plus 5% for the applicable family   HB2699- 14 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    size as determined pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(14) and 2    applicable federal regulations. Persons eligible for 3    medical assistance under this paragraph 18 shall receive 4    coverage for the Health Benefits Service Package as that 5    term is defined in subsection (m) of Section 5-1.1 of this 6    Code. If Illinois' federal medical assistance percentage 7    (FMAP) is reduced below 90% for persons eligible for 8    medical assistance under this paragraph 18, eligibility 9    under this paragraph 18 shall cease no later than the end 10    of the third month following the month in which the 11    reduction in FMAP takes effect. 12        19. Beginning January 1, 2014, as required under 42 13    U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX), persons older than age 18 14    and younger than age 26 who are not otherwise eligible for 15    medical assistance under paragraphs (1) through (17) of 16    this Section who (i) were in foster care under the 17    responsibility of the State on the date of attaining age 18    18 or on the date of attaining age 21 when a court has 19    continued wardship for good cause as provided in Section 20    2-31 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and (ii) received 21    medical assistance under the Illinois Title XIX State Plan 22    or waiver of such plan while in foster care. 23        20. (Blank). Beginning January 1, 2018, persons who 24    are foreign-born victims of human trafficking, torture, or 25    other serious crimes as defined in Section 2-19 of this 26    Code and their derivative family members if such persons:   HB2699- 15 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    (i) reside in Illinois; (ii) are not eligible under any of 2    the preceding paragraphs; (iii) meet the income guidelines 3    of subparagraph (a) of paragraph 2; and (iv) meet the 4    nonfinancial eligibility requirements of Sections 16-2, 5    16-3, and 16-5 of this Code. The Department may extend 6    medical assistance for persons who are foreign-born 7    victims of human trafficking, torture, or other serious 8    crimes whose medical assistance would be terminated 9    pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 16-5 if the 10    Department determines that the person, during the year of 11    initial eligibility (1) experienced a health crisis, (2) 12    has been unable, after reasonable attempts, to obtain 13    necessary information from a third party, or (3) has other 14    extenuating circumstances that prevented the person from 15    completing his or her application for status. The 16    Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement the 17    provisions of this paragraph.18        21. Persons who are not otherwise eligible for medical 19    assistance under this Section who may qualify for medical 20    assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 21    1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XXIII) and 42 U.S.C. 1396(ss) for the 22    duration of any federal or State declared emergency due to 23    COVID-19. Medical assistance to persons eligible for 24    medical assistance solely pursuant to this paragraph 21 25    shall be limited to any in vitro diagnostic product (and 26    the administration of such product) described in 42 U.S.C.   HB2699- 16 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1    1396d(a)(3)(B) on or after March 18, 2020, any visit 2    described in 42 U.S.C. 1396o(a)(2)(G), or any other 3    medical assistance that may be federally authorized for 4    this class of persons. The Department may also cover 5    treatment of COVID-19 for this class of persons, or any 6    similar category of uninsured individuals, to the extent 7    authorized under a federally approved 1115 Waiver or other 8    federal authority. Notwithstanding the provisions of 9    Section 1-11 of this Code, due to the nature of the 10    COVID-19 public health emergency, the Department may cover 11    and provide the medical assistance described in this 12    paragraph 21 to noncitizens who would otherwise meet the 13    eligibility requirements for the class of persons 14    described in this paragraph 21 for the duration of the 15    State emergency period. 16    In implementing the provisions of Public Act 96-20, the 17Department is authorized to adopt only those rules necessary, 18including emergency rules. Nothing in Public Act 96-20 permits 19the Department to adopt rules or issue a decision that expands 20eligibility for the FamilyCare Program to a person whose 21income exceeds 185% of the Federal Poverty Level as determined 22from time to time by the U.S. Department of Health and Human 23Services, unless the Department is provided with express 24statutory authority. 25    The eligibility of any such person for medical assistance 26under this Article is not affected by the payment of any grant   HB2699- 17 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1under the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 2Property Tax Relief Act or any distributions or items of 3income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 4subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.5    The Department shall by rule establish the amounts of 6assets to be disregarded in determining eligibility for 7medical assistance, which shall at a minimum equal the amounts 8to be disregarded under the Federal Supplemental Security 9Income Program. The amount of assets of a single person to be 10disregarded shall not be less than $2,000, and the amount of 11assets of a married couple to be disregarded shall not be less 12than $3,000.13    To the extent permitted under federal law, any person 14found guilty of a second violation of Article VIIIA shall be 15ineligible for medical assistance under this Article, as 16provided in Section 8A-8.17    The eligibility of any person for medical assistance under 18this Article shall not be affected by the receipt by the person 19of donations or benefits from fundraisers held for the person 20in cases of serious illness, as long as neither the person nor 21members of the person's family have actual control over the 22donations or benefits or the disbursement of the donations or 23benefits.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if the 25United States Supreme Court holds Title II, Subtitle A, 26Section 2001(a) of Public Law 111-148 to be unconstitutional,   HB2699- 18 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1or if a holding of Public Law 111-148 makes Medicaid 2eligibility allowed under Section 2001(a) inoperable, the 3State or a unit of local government shall be prohibited from 4enrolling individuals in the Medical Assistance Program as the 5result of federal approval of a State Medicaid waiver on or 6after June 14, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-687), 7and any individuals enrolled in the Medical Assistance Program 8pursuant to eligibility permitted as a result of such a State 9Medicaid waiver shall become immediately ineligible. 10    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, if an 11Act of Congress that becomes a Public Law eliminates Section 122001(a) of Public Law 111-148, the State or a unit of local 13government shall be prohibited from enrolling individuals in 14the Medical Assistance Program as the result of federal 15approval of a State Medicaid waiver on or after June 14, 2012 16(the effective date of Public Act 97-687), and any individuals 17enrolled in the Medical Assistance Program pursuant to 18eligibility permitted as a result of such a State Medicaid 19waiver shall become immediately ineligible. 20    Effective October 1, 2013, the determination of 21eligibility of persons who qualify under paragraphs 5, 6, 8, 2215, 17, and 18 of this Section shall comply with the 23requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(e)(14) and applicable federal 24regulations. 25    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the 26Department of Human Services, and the Illinois health   HB2699- 19 -LRB104 08105 KTG 18151 b1insurance marketplace shall work cooperatively to assist 2persons who would otherwise lose health benefits as a result 3of changes made under Public Act 98-104 to transition to other 4health insurance coverage. 5(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-649, eff. 7-7-20; 6102-43, eff. 7-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-665, eff. 710-8-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)